hyph_hr_HR.dic
ov1lje
ov1ni.
ov1ski
oz1ni.
p1ljen
pa1ti.
pi1ja.
pi1ti.
pos1ta
poz1na
pri1je
pro1tu
r1nik.
r1stvo
ra1ti.
ra1đen
ral1ni
ran1je
ras1po
ras1ta
rat1ni
rav1lj
rav1ni
red1ni
ren1je
ret1ni
ri1ca.
ri1ja.
ri1na.
ri1ti.
ri1zam
ris1ti
rič1ki
rič1ni
s1nik.
s1tan.
sa1ti.
si1ja.
si1ti.
t1nik.
ta1ti.
tal1ni
tar1ni
tav1lj
ti1ca.
ti1ji.
ti1ka.
ti1na.
ti1ti.
ti1zam
ti1čar
tiv1ni
tič1ki
tič1ni
tni1ji
tran1s
tri1je
tu1ra.
u1čen.
u1šen.
ub1lje
up1lje
us1ni.
ut1ni.
uč1ni.
v1ljen
v1nik.
v1ski.
va1ti.
van1je
vi1ca.
vi1jet
vi1ji.
vi1na.
vi1ti.
vjet1l
vod1ni
vor1ni
za1ti.
zi1ja.
zi1ti.
ča1ti.
čen1je
čet1ve
či1ca.
či1na.
či1ti.
š1nji.
š1ten.
š1tvo.
ša1ti.
ši1ti.
ža1ti.
žen1je
ži1ti.
.andr2o1
.angl2o1
.astr2o1
.aud2i2o1
.brut2o1
.cent2i1
.dakn2o1
.disk2o1
.fiz2i2o1
.graf2o1
.hekt2o1
.hel2i2o1
.hidr2o1
.hipe2r1
.infr2a1
.inte2r1
.ital2o1
.kibe2r1
.kozm2o1
.kren2o1
.krim2i1
.krom2o1
.kron2o1
.ksen2o1
.kser2o1
.kvaz2i1
.lab2i2o1
.leuk2o1
.makr2o1
.maks2i1
.met2e2o1
.metr2o1
.mikr2o1
.mnem2o1
.morf2o1
.mult2i1
.muz2e2o1
.nark2o1
.nekr2o1
.neur2o1
.nitr2o1
.olig2o1
.ost2e2o1
.pal2e2o1
.pali2n1
.petr2o1
.porn2o1
.prof2i1
.prom2o1
.prot2o1
.psih2o1
.rad2i2o1
.repr2o1
.retr2o1
.sem2i2o1
.serv2o1
.soc2i2o1
.sten2o1
.supe2r1
.supr2a1
.surd2o1
.tehn2o1
.term2o1
.trof2o1
.turb2o1
.ultr2a1
.vid2e2o1
.alerg2o1
.ampel2o1
.anarh2o1
.argir2o1
.aritm2o1
.austr2o1
.baln2e2o1
.bibl2i2o1
.blast2o1
.bronh2o1
.domat2o1
.ekstr2a1
.entom2o1
.frank2o1
.gastr2o1
.grand2o1
.hemat2o1
.heter2o1
.kabr2i2o1
.kard2i2o1
.klept2o1
.kript2o1
.latin2o1
.megal2o1
.nukl2e2o1
.ornit2o1
.piret2o1
.pneum2o1
.pseud2o1
.sider2o1
.sinkr2o1
.ster2e2o1
.antrop2o1
.arter2i2o1
.daktil2o1
.elektr2o1
.empir2i2o1
.galvan2o1
.german2o1
.magnet2o1
.spektr2o1
.pluskva2m1
.na1g2l2a1s
a1g2l2a1s
.o1p2r2e1m
o1p2r2e1m
o1v2o1l2j1n
l2j
l2j
n2j
j2n
1n2t1
1s2t1
1p2r2e1
u1s2l1u
o1s2l1e
1s2l2o
1l2j1e
tran2s1f
tran2s1k
tran2s1p
tran2s1m
m1i2j1e
i2j1e
